New Jersey, session 222, S4431.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    As used in P.L.    , c.     (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill): Department means the Department of Environmental Protection. Glyphosate means the broad-spectrum, systemic herbicide, that is registered as a pesticide by the United States Environmental Protection Agency, which controls broadleaf weeds and grasses, protects domestically produced crops, and limits weeds around residential and commercial properties. Certified pesticide applicator means any person certified and licensed as a pesticide applicator, to use or supervise the use of pesticides, pursuant to Pesticide Control Act of 1971, P.L.1971, c.176 (C.13:1F-1 et seq.). Pesticide operator means any person trained and licensed as a private or commercial pesticide operator to use pesticides, pursuant to Pesticide Control Act of 1971, P.L.1971, c.176 (C.13:1F-1 et seq.).  Pesticide operator also means any person trained as a commercial pesticide operator, who is under the constant supervision of a certified pesticide applicator at the time and place of pesticide use. 2.    It shall be unlawful for any certified pesticide applicator or pesticide operator to use glyphosate on State- or county-owned property except for the following: a.  Direct use of glyphosate in circumstances in which there is no actual or significant threat of direct human exposure and in which there is no effective, practicable, or viable alternative; and b.  Permitted uses established pursuant to regulations promulgated by the department: (i) to maintain critical public infrastructure; (ii) to ensure public safety; (iii) for habitat management; (iv) for the control of prohibited invasive species, identified pursuant to P.L.2025, c.290 (C.23:2A-17 et seq.), pests of significant public health importance, noxious weeds designated by the department as injurious to system health, and the protection of critical native plant species; and (v) for research on sustainable alternatives to glyphosate for agricultural and environmental uses, as well as research regarding the environmental mobility of glyphosate. 3.    a.  Any certified pesticide applicator or pesticide operator must maintain records of any glyphosate use that was exempted pursuant to section 2 of P.L.    , c. (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), and must make those records available, upon request, for inspection by the department.  The records shall contain the following information: (1) the date, time, and place(s) glyphosate was used; (2) the target pest(s); (3) the amount of glyphosate used; (4) the entity on behalf of which glyphosate is being used for, if applicable; (5) the glyphosate use determination; and (6) the glyphosate alternatives analysis. b.  The department, upon receiving the requested report, shall post this information, including details of each certified pesticide applicator or pesticide operator who is approved for exempted glyphosate use, on a dedicated page on its Internet website, by February fifteenth of each year.  When possible, the department shall incorporate and emphasize details of glyphosate application, as a severable reported entity, in existing surveys of pesticide use across the State. 4.    The Commissioner of Environmental Protection shall, in accordance with the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), adopt rules and regulations as necessary to implement this act. 5.    This act shall take effect immediately.